Maine, session 132, LD660.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §4710-D is enacted to read:
§4710-D. Curriculum and professional development transparency
1. Short title. This section may be known and cited as "the Curriculum Transparency
Act."
2. Policies and procedures. The school board for a school administrative unit shall
adopt policies and procedures to ensure that the approved curriculum presented is
implemented in the classroom without change.
3. Class offerings and curriculum materials. The choice of academic class offerings
and curriculum materials:
A. May not be based on surveys, inventories or other evaluations, analyses or
assessments of:
(1) The immutable and other identifying characteristics of a student, family or
community, including, but not limited to, such characteristics as race, sex, gender,
religion, disability and income;
(2) Psychological or social-emotional data; or
(3) Trauma and other psychological and emotional problems; and
B. Must ensure schools meet the purpose of education as provided in the Constitution
of Maine and disseminate the knowledge needed to ensure the rights and liberties of
United States citizens in the State.
4. Posting and availability of data. A school administrative unit shall post on the
school administrative unit's publicly accessible website, in the section of the website related
to curricula, at least 3 years of data showing numbers and percentages of total student
capacity at each school and enrolled students by grade level, academic subject and
percentage level of proficiency based on state assessment scores. The school administrative
unit shall make the data available for inspection at each school within the school
administrative unit.
5. Professional development and instructional programs. All administrator, teacher
and staff professional development and instructional programs offered to schools that are
paid for with state funds, whether offered directly by the department, another state agency
or a 3rd-party contractor, must be fully transparent and available to the public as follows:
A. The department shall make all program materials, videos, links and resources
publicly available at no charge on the department's publicly accessible website;
B. All program offerings must be open for public attendance to residents of the State;
C. All program offerings must be listed in one location on the department's publicly
accessible website by date and show the title of the program, program description,
location and time. Programs must be publicly posted at least 30 days in advance, with
exceptions applying only when the program is added with fewer than 30 days before
the date of the program based on an emergency as detailed by the school;
D. The school administrative unit shall make audio and video recordings of these
programs and make the recordings accessible to the public free of charge for at least 3
Page 1 - 132LR1876(01)

412 years after the event date. If a program recording was not made or maintained, the
423 program date, name and description must still be listed on the school administrative
434 unit's publicly accessible website for 3 years after the event date has passed with a clear
445 explanation as to why a recording is not available;
E. A school administrative unit shall maintain a list showing the date of attendance,
name and position of each attendee employed by the school administrative unit,
program name and program description for the prior 3 years. The school administrative
unit shall provide this list upon request and free of charge to residents of the State;
F. A school administrative unit may not provide an on-site program prior to the local
school board approving a program available statewide; and
G. The department shall maintain on the department's publicly accessible website a list
of school boards that have approved a program available statewide.
6. Programs provided by 3rd-party contractors. For professional development and
instructional programs offered to schools by 3rd-party contractors, the department shall
maintain data and information on the department's publicly accessible website related to
those programs, including, but not limited to, a breakdown by school administrative unit
for each state-funded program showing the amount paid to the 3rd-party contractor by year
and by program and detailing the public funds spent on program promotion, development,
training, local implementation and other miscellaneous costs for the prior 3 years.
7. Online portal. A school administrative unit shall create an online portal to act as the
single source for all student information and data that can be accessed by 3rd-party
contractors. The portal must consist of an easy-to-search database, including, but not
limited to, the following:
A. All curricula taught by the school administrative unit;
B. All source materials used to develop a school administrative unit's curricula;
C. All documents, and the source materials used to develop those documents, used by
a school administrative unit in the professional development of the school
administrative unit's faculty and staff;
D. All speakers and guests used by a school administrative unit in its professional
development activities; and
E. The costs associated with speakers and guests used by a school administrative unit
in its professional development activities.